Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4022
Laws applicable to financial institutions
and entities.

The
Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act does not supersede any other law applicable
to financial institutions or other entities, and the other law controls if
inconsistent with the act.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 22.